engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 ගෙය .
SFX 3399 Y 1
SFX 3399 0 ගරුක .
SFX 4268 Y 1
SFX 4268 0 වාලන .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 ුණක් .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 ුණකි .
SFX 3017 Y 1
SFX 3017 0 වේවායි .
SFX 3043 Y 1
SFX 3043 0 වාලු .
SFX 1163 Y 1
SFX 1163 0 වෙකුට .
SFX 3976 Y 1
SFX 3976 0 ාලංකාර .
SFX 3739 Y 1
SFX 3739 0 ීමේදි .
SFX 578 Y 1
SFX 578 0 ීමේදී .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 ්නාක් .
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 0 ංගනී .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 0 කිරීමේදී .
SFX 2306 Y 1
SFX 2306 0 ාචාරය .
SFX 402 Y 1
SFX 402 0 ලීම .
SFX 4372 Y 1
SFX 4372 0 ලීය .
SFX 3330 Y 1
SFX 3330 0 දායකයා .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 දායකයි .
SFX 4960 Y 1
SFX 4960 0 ගහන .
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 0 ාංශයේ .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 ෙගොඩ .
SFX 4992 Y 1
SFX 4992 0 ක්කාරයන් .
SFX 4978 Y 1
SFX 4978 0 ගතිමි .
SFX 2132 Y 1
SFX 2132 0 කාරයෙක් .
SFX 2291 Y 1
SFX 2291 0 ාලීමට .
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 0 වල්වල .
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 0 යාමට .
SFX 2946 Y 1
SFX 2946 0 ාංගය .
SFX 3728 Y 1
SFX 3728 0 ුකොට .
SFX 1059 Y 1
SFX 1059 0 වුවහොත් .
SFX 4486 Y 1
SFX 4486 0 යාම් .
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 0 ශීලි .
SFX 658 Y 1
SFX 658 0 ශීලී .
SFX 2375 Y 1
SFX 2375 0 වල්වලින් .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 වරයාටත් .
SFX 1086 Y 1
SFX 1086 0 යාමේ .
SFX 2983 Y 1
SFX 2983 0 සියයකට .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 ිවීමෙන් .
SFX 2982 Y 1
SFX 2982 0 සියයක් .
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 0 ෙදි .
SFX 940 Y 1
SFX 940 0 ෙදී .
SFX 2330 Y 1
SFX 2330 0 ස්ට .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 ස්ත .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 0 ස්ථ .
SFX 4118 Y 1
SFX 4118 0 ස්ම .
SFX 4116 Y 1
SFX 4116 0 ස්ය .
SFX 4804 Y 1
SFX 4804 0 දවා .
SFX 4626 Y 1
SFX 4626 0 පෙත් .
SFX 3233 Y 1
SFX 3233 0 පෙති .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 0 ස්ව .
SFX 4483 Y 1
SFX 4483 0 යාවන්ට .
SFX 4802 Y 1
SFX 4802 0 දානයක් .
SFX 4149 Y 1
SFX 4149 0 සිල් .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 වාදීන්ට .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 ාවන්ගේ .
SFX 4036 Y 1
SFX 4036 0 ාණයේ .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 නමය .
SFX 1295 Y 1
SFX 1295 0 වුවත් .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 නම් .
SFX 4926 Y 1
SFX 4926 0 ජික .
SFX 3054 Y 1
SFX 3054 0 වල්වලට .
SFX 3520 Y 1
SFX 3520 0 ්නුවා .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 ්නුවේ .
SFX 1261 Y 1
SFX 1261 0 ීකරණය .
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 0 ාගාරයේදී .
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 0 සිංහයන් .
SFX 3139 Y 1
SFX 3139 0 රීමට .
SFX 4757 Y 1
SFX 4757 0 ධරයකු .
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 0 හේන .
SFX 1345 Y 1
SFX 1345 0 ත්වයකට .
SFX 3816 Y 1
SFX 3816 0 ියක්ද .
SFX 2246 Y 1
SFX 2246 0 ියක්ම .
SFX 4421 Y 1
SFX 4421 0 රීම් .
SFX 3885 Y 1
SFX 3885 0 ිකරලා .
SFX 1480 Y 1
SFX 1480 0 රීමේ .
SFX 3498 Y 1
SFX 3498 0 ්‍යායතන .
SFX 201 Y 1
SFX 201 0 ත්වයක් .
SFX 1753 Y 1
SFX 1753 0 ත්වයකි .
SFX 2807 Y 1
SFX 2807 0 ියාවක් .
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 0 ගෙනය .
SFX 1408 Y 1
SFX 1408 0 ිකයින් .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 ගෙන් .
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 0 ාවෙලා .
SFX 1774 Y 1
SFX 1774 0 ගෙනි .
SFX 4774 Y 1
SFX 4774 0 දෙනවා .
SFX 4129 Y 1
SFX 4129 0 සේත් .
SFX 3009 Y 1
SFX 3009 0 ශීල .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 හරින .
SFX 2950 Y 1
SFX 2950 0 ළත් .
SFX 1429 Y 1
SFX 1429 0 ාගන්නට .
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 0 ුනට .
SFX 1730 Y 1
SFX 1730 0 න්වත් .
SFX 1606 Y 1
SFX 1606 0 ුනද .
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 0 නහොත් .
SFX 1812 Y 1
SFX 1812 0 ්ගත් .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 ාගන්නා .
SFX 247 Y 1
SFX 247 0 ුන් .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 ාගන්නේ .
SFX 3112 Y 1
SFX 3112 0 ලීමත් .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 0 ුනා .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 ුනි .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 ුනු .
SFX 2213 Y 1
SFX 2213 0 ුනෙ .
SFX 656 Y 1
SFX 656 0 ුනේ .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 ාවීම .
SFX 4765 Y 1
SFX 4765 0 දෝරු .
SFX 4229 Y 1
SFX 4229 0 වීමක්ද .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 ිනවා .
SFX 3096 Y 1
SFX 3096 0 වක්වත් .
SFX 870 Y 1
SFX 870 0 කයන්ගේ .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 ාංගවලින් .
SFX 1683 Y 1
SFX 1683 0 ලෝක .
SFX 4494 Y 1
SFX 4494 0 යයන්හි .
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 ගැනීම .
SFX 2496 Y 1
SFX 2496 0 පන්දු .
SFX 703 Y 1
SFX 703 0 යම් .
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 0 න්ටයි .
SFX 4499 Y 1
SFX 4499 0 යමේ .
SFX 3725 Y 1
SFX 3725 0 ුගම .
SFX 3218 Y 1
SFX 3218 0 භූමිය .
SFX 3724 Y 1
SFX 3724 0 ුගල .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 ණිය .
SFX 3462 Y 1
SFX 3462 0 එළිය .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 වලින් .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 වලිනි .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 ුගේ .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 වරණයට .
SFX 702 Y 1
SFX 702 0 යේදි .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 යේදී .
SFX 812 Y 1
SFX 812 0 කදි .
SFX 105 Y 1
SFX 105 0 කදී .
SFX 847 Y 1
SFX 847 0 ලාගේ .
SFX 3140 Y 1
SFX 3140 0 රියෙන් .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 ්නටත් .
SFX 4632 Y 1
SFX 4632 0 පිටියේදී .
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 0 වරණයේ .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 ෙනුත් .
SFX 4091 Y 1
SFX 4091 0 හලෙන් .
SFX 2499 Y 1
SFX 2499 0 පතිතුමා .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 වකුගේ .
SFX 2742 Y 1
SFX 2742 0 ුවමින් .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 ියක .
SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 ියට .
SFX 2243 Y 1
SFX 2243 0 ියද .
SFX 3811 Y 1
SFX 3811 0 ියන .
SFX 1886 Y 1
SFX 1886 0 ියම .
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 0 වලිය .
SFX 4829 Y 1
SFX 4829 0 ත්කර .
SFX 2809 Y 1
SFX 2809 0 ියහ .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 ියා .
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 0 ියි .
SFX 1037 Y 1
SFX 1037 0 ියෙ .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 ියේ .
SFX 580 Y 1
SFX 580 0 ියෝ .
SFX 4518 Y 1
SFX 4518 0 යටපත් .
SFX 1591 Y 1
SFX 1591 0 ෙකට .
SFX 2336 Y 1
SFX 2336 0 සුන .
SFX 2080 Y 1
SFX 2080 0 තෙල් .
SFX 1935 Y 1
SFX 1935 0 සුම .
SFX 2194 Y 1
SFX 2194 0 ෙකම .
SFX 4289 Y 1
SFX 4289 0 වලියෙහි .
SFX 2644 Y 1
SFX 2644 0 ්සල් .
SFX 2315 Y 1
SFX 2315 0 හැකි .
SFX 2390 Y 1
SFX 2390 0 වයත් .
SFX 4136 Y 1
SFX 4136 0 සුව .
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 0 භාර .
SFX 1693 Y 1
SFX 1693 0 රෙන් .
SFX 629 Y 1
SFX 629 0 ාටත් .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 ෙක් .
SFX 216 Y 1
SFX 216 0 ෙකි .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 0 ෙකු .
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 0 භාව .
SFX 3801 Y 1
SFX 3801 0 ියෙකුට .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 යෙන්ද .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 යෙන්ම .
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 0 වදී .
SFX 3062 Y 1
SFX 3062 0 වරුවේ .
SFX 4134 Y 1
SFX 4134 0 සෙට් .
SFX 1719 Y 1
SFX 1719 0 ඵල .
SFX 3893 Y 1
SFX 3893 0 ිකමට .
SFX 1819 Y 1
SFX 1819 0 ෝන් .
SFX 3360 Y 1
SFX 3360 0 තයේදී .
SFX 2861 Y 1
SFX 2861 0 ිකම් .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 රුවෙන් .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 ීට .
SFX 3753 Y 1
SFX 3753 0 ීත .
SFX 2225 Y 1
SFX 2225 0 ීද .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 ීන .
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 0 ාවන්හි .
SFX 59 Y 1
SFX 59 0 ීම .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 0 ීය .
SFX 2150 Y 1
SFX 2150 0 ්වුණ .
SFX 1139 Y 1
SFX 1139 0 ීව .
SFX 2525 Y 1
SFX 2525 0 නවිට .
SFX 3473 Y 1
SFX 3473 0 ්වුව .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 තුමන් .
SFX 4587 Y 1
SFX 4587 0 මණ්ඩල .
SFX 4877 Y 1
SFX 4877 0 ණ්ඩු .
SFX 127 Y 1
SFX 127 0 වකට .
SFX 4349 Y 1
SFX 4349 0 වකද .
SFX 1679 Y 1
SFX 1679 0 වකම .
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 0 මවන .
SFX 1652 Y 1
SFX 1652 0 සීමට .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 0 දෙන්න .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 0 ිසර .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 ල්ලක .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 0 ල්ලට .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 වක් .
SFX 4357 Y 1
SFX 4357 0 ල්ලද .
SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 වකි .
SFX 1004 Y 1
SFX 1004 0 තුමාට .
SFX 309 Y 1
SFX 309 0 වකු .
SFX 643 Y 1
SFX 643 0 තුමාගේ .
SFX 882 Y 1
SFX 882 0 ිස් .
SFX 2463 Y 1
SFX 2463 0 මවා .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 ිසි .
SFX 3154 Y 1
SFX 3154 0 ‍රයක් .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 නවුන් .
SFX 3767 Y 1
SFX 3767 0 ිසේ .
SFX 2502 Y 1
SFX 2502 0 ඳුන් .
SFX 1937 Y 1
SFX 1937 0 සීමේ .
SFX 1681 Y 1
SFX 1681 0 ල්ලා .
SFX 1073 Y 1
SFX 1073 0 ල්ලේ .
SFX 4841 Y 1
SFX 4841 0 තීය .
SFX 4931 Y 1
SFX 4931 0 ච් .
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 0 දෙනාගේ .
SFX 3382 Y 1
SFX 3382 0 චි .
SFX 2530 Y 1
SFX 2530 0 නන්ගේ .
SFX 859 Y 1
SFX 859 0 තාවට .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 තාවද .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 තාවය .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 කුත් .
SFX 1748 Y 1
SFX 1748 0 දීමක් .
SFX 3684 Y 1
SFX 3684 0 ුරට .
SFX 1250 Y 1
SFX 1250 0 ූවක් .
SFX 2729 Y 1
SFX 2729 0 ූවකි .
SFX 1855 Y 1
SFX 1855 0 ුරා .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 0 ුරු .
SFX 3677 Y 1
SFX 3677 0 ුරේ .
SFX 3107 Y 1
SFX 3107 0 ලෝකය .
SFX 1893 Y 1
SFX 1893 0 ින්ට .
SFX 2825 Y 1
SFX 2825 0 ින්ඩ .
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 0 ින්ද .
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 0 ින්න .
SFX 4156 Y 1
SFX 4156 0 සිද්ධිය .
SFX 4891 Y 1
SFX 4891 0 ණවලින් .
SFX 227 Y 1
SFX 227 0 ින්ම .
SFX 4881 Y 1
SFX 4881 0 ණුවලින් .
SFX 776 Y 1
SFX 776 0 ිමින් .
SFX 4892 Y 1
SFX 4892 0 ණවත් .
SFX 3823 Y 1
SFX 3823 0 ිමිනි .
SFX 3951 Y 1
SFX 3951 0 ාශයක් .
SFX 4605 Y 1
SFX 4605 0 බිඳු .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 කරගෙන .
SFX 1786 Y 1
SFX 1786 0 කරයට .
SFX 2714 Y 1
SFX 2714 0 ෙන්වත් .
SFX 4310 Y 1
SFX 4310 0 වරටත් .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 0 කරයි .
