engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.dic
ඇමැති/1,3,10,12,35,42,54,89,118,141,159,164,231,258,312,345,350,352,385,386,440,468,474,501,605,976,977,1004,1066,1124,1171,1259,1338,1744,2210,2223,2379,2380,2381,2382,2383,3063,3351,3450,3700,3741
කන්ද/1,2,4,5,8,13,14,17,47,59,80,132,195,315,326,442,2426,2723,2991,3456,3589,4475
කරව/13,20,33,41,52,57,59,62,80,83,88,107,109,122,129,136,155,177,211,241,307,328,422,424,497,625,664,692,770,854,1250,1335,1646,2197,2276,2505,2508,2536,2782,2784,3110,3739
ගිනි/13,15,26,61,113,202,232,703,1492,1555,1704,2602,3221,3700,4874,4875,4960,4995
ගුණ/2,3,4,14,19,23,27,34,40,44,48,55,71,74,93,225,308,335,343,359,412,455,470,498,519,543,588,705,729,785,787,834,954,959,1105,1184,1509,2310,2448,2451,2946,2975,3095,3399,3453,4055,4149,4339,4351,4448,4522,4799
නිර්මාණ/3,14,15,19,26,27,29,31,40,44,56,68,74,108,191,210,308,324,355,471,472,590,658,704,887,891,919,1366,1367,1657,2561,2637,3008,3302,4193
පතුරු/31,37,54,259,368,564,2371,3081,4268
පාර/1,2,4,8,11,17,20,21,24,25,26,28,30,32,33,47,69,77,89,181,208,220,271,294,397,478,514,515,575,719,854,940,1389,1560,2220,2596,2644,3054,3055,3487,3553,4555
පැන/1,3,6,14,16,18,19,43,44,49,51,52,53,56,57,59,61,62,63,76,80,82,86,107,113,122,130,144,146,150,203,212,223,238,244,264,265,351,368,373,395,459,485,486,524,546,551,645,841,895,988,1018,1313,1688,1803,1877,2111,2444,2644,2669,2685,3546,3912,3915
පෙනෙන/7,297,817,872,1160,1521
බසය/1,2,4,8,17,21,25,679
බාල/6,7,9,16,17,24,27,41,42,49,64,90,93,104,349,380,412,597,727,777,837,1044,1045,1407,1456,1773,1925,2069,2110,2175,2309,2677,2690,2845,2848,2850,3530,4012
මධ්‍ය/3,7,15,17,19,23,68,94,379,1055,1324,1438,1761,2972,4685
මාර්ග/3,5,7,11,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,40,44,48,55,56,68,71,74,94,121,147,171,210,228,237,240,330,360,379,910,1083,1438,2972,4523
මුල/1,2,4,5,6,7,13,18,20,21,22,24,33,77,101,110,125,139,147,156,227,233,272,394,437,617,651,675,687,814,932,936,966,1017,1046,1225,1437,1633,1650,1924,2149,2156,2285,2336,2659,2689,2889,3491,3492,3493,3539,4052,4120,4140,4486
යුක්ති/1939,3399
රෝගියෙක්/35
වඩින/20,24,37,43,249,3043
වසර/1,2,4,8,13,17,18,21,25,26,29,30,32,89,105,133,171,181,220,295,302,313,372,435,475,649,679,940,4020
වහල/1,2,3,4,6,14,15,19,20,26,153,215,220,237,247,1797,2375
වළක්ව/1428,1430,2291,2899
වාසි/470,4799
විචාර/3,11,13,14,17,19,23,27,33,40,107,112,128,147,162,212,308,322,382,473,525,589,590,671,710,809,870,891,928,1109,1185,1371,2587
විද්‍ය/179,463,744,919,2176,3976
විලියම්/2330,4178
විසි/162,549,695,758,788,807,855,996,1052,1180,1205,1461,1522,1722,1750,1779,1997,2001,2321,2322,2508,3245,4100,4426,4647,4839
විහාර/3,14,15,19,20,23,26,27,55,71,74,121,202,299,411,565,740,834,851,960,966,1162,1167,1182,1280,1289,1432,1437,1438,1650,2107,2108,2326,2327,2328,2329,2370,2928,2970,4018,4055,4121,4569,4944
වෛර/3,14,15,19,23,31,41,48,56,97,121,910,968,1290,1655,1940,2684,2996,4112,4172,4992
සලක/6,13,18,20,33,61,88,109,120,136,155,162,177,211,241,256,277,283,531,664,666,668,707,853,854,2079,2218,2766,2772,3709
සාද/3,6,13,14,15,19,20,33,37,44,68,88,109,136,233,424,526,631,692,1050,1078,1428,1430,1646,1647,2306,2307,2415,3129
සැලක/2,6,24,41,52,59,80,83,107,111,120,122,129,160,170,208,212,221,222,229,238,271,277,280,289,328,378,497,578,596,720,766,876,883,1036,1080,1620,1877,1878,2232,2772,3603,3644,3783,3784
සිර/12,63,82,85,86,94,97,146,191,261,271,357,361,384,391,408,472,648,672,759,838,924,925,1011,1013,1118,1492,1546,2108,2132,2325,2627,3441,4944
සිවි/402
සුර/14,20,24,161,248,406,437,480,713,894,2145,2881,2882,3420,3584,3586,3647,3830,4041,4986
සේවා/470,1438,2847,2849,3330,3881,4541
සොයා/416,1086,4953
හඳුනා/4975,4978
හාර/5,20,33,62,155,162,177,193,211,241,424,582,632,1501,1750,2982,2983,3307,3334,4146
හැකි/3,11,13,37,38,54,63,71,76,82,89,130,144,146,149,167,188,194,198,223,230,292,367,399,401,402,404,429,453,463,482,485,486,500,843,895,973,1075,1164,1319,1439,1451,1473,1948,1986,2016,2017,2091,2356,2438,2457,2569,3017,3173,4067,4483
හැඳින්/38,76,86,130,144,194,223,230,244,264,368,399,464,482,486,562,731,893,895,972,1059,1295,1448,1451,3020
හැරුණ/1850,3728
ළදරු/897,1163,1468
